Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3917
Office of public defender; abolished; when.

Any county in a judicial district in which a determination is made that a public defender should be named in accordance with section 29-3910 shall no longer be subject to section 23-3401, and the office created by section 23-3401 shall be abolished as of the date specified in such determination.

Laws 1969, c. 234, § 9, p. 866;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1805.09;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 35.